New Jersey, session 222, A5192.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank, established pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) (hereinafter referred to as the trust), is authorized to expend the aggregate sum of up to $3.85 billion and any uncommitted balance of the aggregate expenditures authorized pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2000, c.93, section 1 of P.L.2001, c.224, section 1 of P.L.2002, c.71, section 1 of P.L.2003, c.159, section 1 of P.L.2004, c.110, section 1 of P.L.2005, c.197, section 1 of P.L.2006, c.67, section 1 of P.L.2007, c.140, section 1 of P.L.2008, c.67, section 1 of P.L.2009, c.101, section 1 of P.L.2010, c.62, section 1 of P.L.2011, c.95, section 1 of P.L.2012, c.38, section 1 of P.L.2013, c.94, section 1 of P.L.2014, c.26, section 1 of P.L.2015, c.107, section 1 of P.L.2016, c.31, as amended by P.L.2017, c.13, section 1 of P.L.2017, c.142, as amended by P.L.2017, c.327, P.L.2018, c.84, as amended by P.L.2019, c.30, section 1 of P.L.2019, c.192, as amended by P.L.2019, c.515, P.L.2020, c.48, as amended by P.L.2021, c.22, section 1 of P.L.2021, c.204, as amended by P.L.2021, c.316, P.L.2022, c.100, as amended by P.L.2023, c.5, P.L.2023, c.119, as amended by P.L.2023, c.343, P.L.2024, c.41, as amended by P.L.2025, c.8, and P.L.2025, c.125, as amended by P.L.2025, c.183, for the purpose of making loans, to the extent sufficient funds are available, to or on behalf of local government units or public water utilities (hereinafter referred to as project sponsors) to finance all or a portion of the cost of construction of environmental infrastructure projects listed in sections 2 and 4 of this act. b.  The trust is authorized to increase the aggregate sums specified in subsection a. of this section by: (1) the amounts of capitalized interest, interest accrued pursuant to a short-term or temporary loan made to a project sponsor pursuant to the Interim Environmental Financing Program, administrative expenses associated with any federal funding programs, if applicable, and the bond issuance expenses as provided in subsection b. of section 7 of this act; (2) the amounts of reserve capacity expenses and debt service reserve fund requirements as provided in subsection c. of section 7 of this act; (3) the interest earned on amounts deposited for project costs pending their distribution to project sponsors as provided in subsection d. of section 7 of this act; (4) the amounts of the loan origination fee as provided in subsection e. of section 7 of this act; (5) the amount appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purpose of making zero-interest and principal-forgiveness loans pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as Senate Bill No. 4221 of the 2026-2027 session and Assembly Bill No.      of the 2026-2027 session) in connection with the project costs of a particular project sponsor, to the extent the priority ranking or an insufficiency of funding prevent the department from meeting program demand as provided in subsection f. of section 7 of this act; and (6) any funds transferred to the trust by the department pursuant to paragraph (21) of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as Senate Bill No. 4221 of the 2026-2027 session and Assembly Bill No.      of the 2026-2027 session). c.  (1) Of the sums made available to the trust from the Water Supply Trust Fund established pursuant to subsection a. of section 15 of the Water Supply Bond Act of 1981 (P.L.1981, c.261), pursuant to P.L.1997, c.223, the trust is authorized to transfer such amounts to the Department of Environmental Protection as needed for drinking water project loans pursuant to the Safe Drinking Water Act Amendments of 1996, Pub.L.104-182, and any amendatory and supplementary acts thereto (hereinafter referred to as the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act), under terms and conditions established by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection and the trust, and approved by the State Treasurer, which loans shall be jointly administered by the trust and department. (2) Of the sums appropriated to the trust from the Wastewater Treatment Trust Fund established pursuant to section 15 of the Wastewater Treatment Bond Act of 1985, (P.L.1985, c.329), pursuant to P.L.1987, c.198, the trust is authorized to transfer such amounts as needed to the Clean Water State Revolving Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2009, c.77 for the purposes of issuing loans or providing the State match as required for the award of capitalization grants made available to the State for clean water projects pursuant to the Water Quality Act of 1987 (33 U.S.C. s.1251 et seq.), and any amendatory and supplementary acts thereto (hereinafter referred to as the Federal Clean Water Act). (3) Of the sums appropriated to the trust from the 1992 Wastewater Treatment Trust Fund established pursuant to section 27 of the Green Acres, Clean Water, Farmland and Historic Preservation Bond Act of 1992 (P.L.1992, c.88), pursuant to P.L.1996, c.86, the trust is authorized to transfer such amounts as needed to the Clean Water State Revolving Fund for the purpose of providing the State match as required for the award of capitalization grants made available to the State for clean water projects pursuant to the Federal Clean Water Act. (4) Of the sums appropriated to the trust from the Stormwater Management and Combined Sewer Overflow Abatement Fund created pursuant to section 14 of the Stormwater Management and Combined Sewer Overflow Abatement Bond Act of 1989, P.L.1989, c.181, pursuant to P.L.1998, c.87, the trust is authorized to transfer such amounts as needed to the Clean Water State Revolving Fund for the purpose of providing the State match as required for the award of capitalization grants made available to the State for clean water projects pursuant to the Federal Clean Water Act. (5) Of the sums appropriated to the trust from the 2003 Water Resources and Wastewater Treatment Trust Fund established pursuant to subsection b. of section 19 of the Dam, Lake, Stream, Flood Control, Water Resources, and Wastewater Treatment Project Bond Act of 2003 (P.L.2003, c.162), pursuant to P.L.2004, c.110, the trust is authorized to transfer such amounts as needed to the Clean Water State Revolving Fund for the purpose of providing the State match as required for the award of capitalization grants made available to the State for clean water projects pursuant to the Federal Clean Water Act. (6)  Of the sums appropriated to the trust from repayments of loans deposited in any account, including the Clean Water State Revolving Fund, Wastewater Treatment Fund, the 1992 Wastewater Treatment Fund, the Water Supply Fund, the Stormwater Management and Combined Sewer Overflow Abatement Fund or the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, as appropriate, pursuant to sections 11 and 12 of P.L.1995, c.219, sections 11 and 12 of P.L.1996, c.85, sections 11 and 12 of P.L.1997, c.221, sections 12 and 13 of P.L.1998, c.84, section 11 of P.L.1999, c.174, section 11 of P.L.2000, c.92, section 11 of P.L.2001, c.222, section 11 of P.L.2002, c.70, section 11 of P.L.2003, c.158, section 11 of P.L.2004, c.109, section 11 of P.L.2005, c.196, section 11 of P.L.2006, c.68, section 10 of P.L.2007, c.140, section 10 of P.L.2008, c.67, section 10 of P.L.2009, c.101, section 10 of P.L.2010, c.62, section 10 of P.L.2011, c.95, section 10 of P.L.2012, c.38, section 10 of P.L.2013, c.94, section 10 of P.L.2014, c.26, section 10 of P.L.2015, c.107, section 10 of P.L.2016, c.31, section 10 of P.L.2017, c.142, as amended by section 10 of P.L.2017, c.327, section 10 of P.L.2018, c.84, as amended by P.L.2019, c.30, section 10 of P.L.2019, c.192, as amended by section 10 of P.L.2019, c.515, section 10 of P.L.2020, c.48, as amended by P.L.2021, c.22, section 10 of P.L.2021, c.204, as amended by P.L. 2021, c.316, section 10 of P.L.2022, c.100, as amended by P.L.2023, c.5, section 10 of P.L.2023, c.119, as amended by P.L.2023, c.343, P.L.2024, c.41, as amended by P.L.2025, c.8, P.L.2025, c.125, as amended by P.L.2025, c.183, and section 10 of this act, for deposit into one or more reserve funds or accounts established by the trust pursuant to section 11 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-11), the trust shall transfer to the respective fund of origin the uncommitted balance of all such moneys no longer utilized by the trust for such purposes. d.  For the purposes of this act: Capitalized interest means the amount equal to interest paid on trust bonds which is funded with trust bond proceeds and the earnings thereon; Debt service reserve fund expenses means the debt service reserve fund costs associated with reserve capacity expenses, water supply projects for which the project sponsors are public water utilities as provided in section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9), other drinking water projects not eligible for, or interested in, State or federal debt service reserve funds pursuant to the Water Supply Bond Act of 1981, P.L.1981, c.261 as amended and supplemented by P.L.1997, c.223, and any clean water projects not eligible for, or interested in, State or federal debt service reserve funds from the Clean Water State Revolving Fund; Issuance expenses means any costs related to the issuance of trust bonds and includes, but is not limited to, the costs of financial document printing, bond insurance premiums or other credit enhancement, underwriters discount, verification of financial calculations, the services of bond rating agencies and trustees, and the employment of accountants, attorneys, financial advisors, loan servicing agents, registrars, and paying agents; JMEUC means the Joint Meeting of Essex and Union Counties. Loan origination fee means the fee charged by the Department of Environmental Protection and financed under the trust loan to pay a portion of the costs incurred by the department in the implementation of the New Jersey Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program; and Reserve capacity expenses means those project costs for reserve capacity not eligible for loans under rules and regulations governing zero-interest loans adopted by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.329, but which are eligible for loans from the trust in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the trust pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-27). e.   The trust is authorized to increase the loan amount in the future to compensate for a refunding of the issue, provided adequate savings are achieved, for the loans issued pursuant to P.L.1995, c.218, P.L.1996, c.87, P.L.1997, c.222, P.L.1998, c.85, P.L.1999, c.173, P.L.2000, c.93, P.L.2001, c.224, P.L.2002, c.71, P.L.2003, c.159, P.L.2004, c.110, P.L.2005, c.197, P.L.2006, c.67, P.L.2007, c.140, P.L.2008, c.67, P.L.2009, c.101, P.L.2010, c.62, P.L.2011, c.95, P.L.2012, c.38, P.L.2013, c.94, P.L.2014, c.26, P.L.2015, c.107, P.L.2016, c.31, as amended by P.L.2017, c.13, P.L.2017, c.142, as amended by P.L.2017, c.327, P.L.2018, c.84, as amended by P.L.2019, c.30, P.L.2019, c.192, as amended by P.L.2019, c.515, P.L.2020, c.48, as amended by P.L.2021, c.22, P.L.2021, c.204, as amended by P.L.2021, c.316, P.L.2022, c.100, as amended by P.L.2023, c.5, P.L.2023, c.119, as amended by P.L.2023, c.343, section 10 of P.L.2024, c.41, as amended by P.L.2025, c.8., P.L.2025, c.125, as amended by P.L.2025, c.182, and section 10 of this act. 2.  a.  (1) The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank is authorized to expend funds for the purpose of making supplemental loans to or on behalf of the project sponsors listed below for the following clean water environmental infrastructure projects: Project Sponsor Project Number Estimated Allowable Trust Loan Amount Estimated Total Loan Amount Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-32R $15,000,000 $20,000,000 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-33R $9,075,000 $12,100,000 Elizabeth City S340942-20R $4,350,000 $5,800,000 Hoboken City S340635-08R $7,875,000 $10,500,000 Jersey City Municipal Utilities Authority S340928-37R $32,775,000 $43,700,000 North Bergen Municipal Utilities Authority S340652-16R $13,200,000 $17,600,000 North Hudson Sewer Authority S340952-37R $2,550,000 $3,400,000 North Hudson Sewer Authority S340952-40R $3,750,000 $5,000,000 North Hudson Sewer Authority S340952-42R $17,925,000 $23,900,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-51R $45,600,000 $60,800,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-37R $24,000,000 $32,000,000 Ridgefield Park Village S340688-06R $1,425,000 $1,900,000 Total Projects: 12 $177,525,000 $236,700,000 (2) A loan authorized by this subsection shall be made to or on behalf of the project sponsor listed, up to the individual amount indicated, to the extent sufficient funds are available, except if a project fails to meet the requirements of section 6 of this act. (3) The loans for projects authorized by this subsection shall have priority over the environmental infrastructure projects listed in subsection a. of section 4 of this act. b.  (1) The trust is authorized to expend funds for the purpose of making supplemental loans to or on behalf of the project sponsors listed below for the following drinking water environmental infrastructure projects: Project Sponsor Project Number Estimated Allowable Trust Loan Amount Estimated Total Loan Amount Brick Township Municipal Utilities Authority 1506001-011R $2,812,500 $3,750,000 Camden City 0408001-001R $9,750,000 $13,000,000 East Orange City 0705001-014R $1,500,000 $2,000,000 New Brunswick City 1214001-005R $56,778,750 $75,705,000 Total Projects: 4 $70,841,250 $94,455,000 (2) A loan authorized by this subsection shall be made to or on behalf of the project sponsor listed, up to the individual amount indicated, to the extent sufficient funds are available, except if a project fails to meet the requirements of section 6 of this act. (3) The loans for projects authorized by this subsection shall have priority over environmental infrastructure projects listed in subsection b. of section 4 of this act. c.  The trust is authorized to adjust the allowable trust loan amount for the projects authorized in this section to between zero percent and 100 percent of the total allowable loan amount. 3.  a.  The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank is authorized to make loans to or on behalf of the project sponsors for the clean water projects listed in subsection a. of section 2 and subsection a. of section 4 of this act up to the individual amounts indicated and in the priority stated, except that any such amount may be reduced by the trust pursuant to subsection a. of section 7 of this act, or if a project fails to meet the requirements of section 6 of this act.  The trust is authorized to increase any such amount pursuant to subsections b., c., d., e., or f. of section 7 of this act, or pursuant to section 8 of this act. b.  The trust is authorized to make loans to project sponsors for the drinking water projects listed in subsection b. of section 4 of this act up to the individual amounts indicated and in the priority stated, except that any such amount may be reduced by the trust pursuant to subsection a. of section 7 of this act, or if a project fails to meet the requirements of section 6 of this act.  The trust is authorized to increase any such amount pursuant to subsections b., c., d., e., or f. of section 7 of this act or pursuant to section 8 of this act. c.  The trust is authorized to make loans to local government units for clean water and drinking water projects partially funded from the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Fund established pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1985, c.302 for the balance of allowable project costs up to the individual amounts indicated, provided that any such amount may be reduced by the trust pursuant to subsection a. of section 7 of this act, or if a project fails to meet the requirements of section 6 of this act.  There is appropriated to the trust from the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Fund established pursuant to section 14 of the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Bond Act of 1985, P.L.1985, c.302, an amount sufficient to implement the provisions of this subsection. The following local government units are eligible for funding from the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Fund and for loans from the trust in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the trust pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-27) for the following clean water and drinking water projects: Project Sponsor Project Number Estimated Total Loan Amount Pemberton Twp. Pinelands 1 $2,929,000 Manchester Twp./Jackson MUA Pinelands 2 $7,192,035 Galloway Twp. Pinelands 4 $3,493,440 Winslow Twp. Pinelands 5 $1,728,940 Total Pinelands Projects: 4 $15,343,415 d.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any applicable law or regulation to the contrary, drinking water projects may be funded by the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Fund established pursuant to section 14 of the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Bond Act of 1985, P.L.1985, c.302.  Drinking water projects financed by the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Fund shall be funded in accordance with the regulations applicable to the financing of wastewater projects by the Pinelands Infrastructure Trust Fund unless and until regulations specific to the financing of drinking water projects are promulgated. 4.  a.  The following environmental infrastructure projects shall be known and may be cited as the Storm Sandy and State Fiscal Year 2027 Clean Water Project Eligibility List: Project Sponsor Project Number Estimated Allowable Trust Loan Amount Estimated Total Loan Amount Oakland Borough S340418-06 $5,790,000 $7,720,000 Rahway Valley Sewerage Authority S340547-17 $4,500,000 $6,000,000 Rahway Valley Sewerage Authority S340547-18 $5,625,000 $7,500,000 Mendham Borough S340159-04 $4,125,000 $5,500,000 Newark City S340815-25 $750,000 $1,000,000 Berkeley Heights Township S340385-05 $5,625,000 $7,500,000 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-32 $26,925,000 $35,900,000 Montgomery Township S340130-03 $21,750,000 $29,000,000 Newton Town S340449-09 $5,250,000 $7,000,000 Montgomery Township S340130-05 $14,812,500 $19,750,000 Camden City S340366-14 $7,027,500 $9,370,000 Jersey City Municipal Utilities Authority S340928-37 $37,651,862 $50,202,482 Middlesex County Utilities Authority S340699-18 $15,750,000 $21,000,000 Middlesex County Utilities Authority S340699-21 $26,625,000 $35,500,000 Middlesex County Utilities Authority S340699-17 $19,500,000 $26,000,000 North Bergen Municipal Utilities Authority S340652-16 $46,500,000 $62,000,000 Hoboken City S340635-08 $28,500,000 $38,000,000 Paterson City S340850-07 $3,000,000 $4,000,000 Elizabeth City S340942-20 $17,250,000 $23,000,000 Elizabeth City S345070-01 $3,000,001 $4,000,001 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-33 $21,750,000 $29,000,000 Kearny Town S340259-11 $12,750,000 $17,000,000 Ridgefield Park Village S340688-06 $9,150,000 $12,200,000 Paterson City S340850-08 $900,000 $1,200,000 Bayshore Regional Sewer Authority S340697-07 $23,625,000 $31,500,000 Ocean County Utilities Authority S340372-64 $37,500,000 $50,000,000 Bayshore Regional Sewer Authority S340697-09 $3,847,350 $5,129,800 North Hudson Sewer Authority S340952-42 $40,125,000 $53,500,000 North Hudson Sewer Authority S340952-40 $17,625,000 $23,500,000 North Hudson Sewer Authority S340952-37 $9,750,000 $13,000,000 North Hudson Sewer Authority S340952-39 $13,500,000 $18,000,000 Perth Amboy City S340435-22 $5,250,000 $7,000,000 Verona Township S340533-05 $1,875,000 $2,500,000 Hackensack City S340923-16 $10,500,000 $14,000,000 Millville City S340921-09 $8,250,000 $11,000,000 Ship Bottom Borough S340311-06 $2,212,500 $2,950,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-37 $91,125,000 $121,500,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-44 $18,000,000 $24,000,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S345200-01 $7,500,000 $10,000,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-51 $92,437,500 $123,250,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-49 $222,102,676 $296,136,901 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-33 $80,250,000 $107,000,000 Mount Laurel Township Municipal Utilities Authority S340943-08 $5,400,000 $7,200,000 Pennsville Sewerage Authority S340870-05 $7,500,000 $10,000,000 Beach Haven Borough S344220-01 $2,700,000 $3,600,000 Stony Brook Regional Sewer Authority S340400-12 $17,400,000 $23,200,000 Ocean County Utilities Authority S340372-78 $862,500 $1,150,000 Bergen County Utilities Authority S340386-23 $45,000,000 $60,000,000 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-44 $1,275,000 $1,700,000 Linden Roselle Sewer Authority S340299-08 $20,250,000 $27,000,000 Flemington Borough S340440-06 $1,102,500 $1,470,000 Elizabeth City (JMEUC) S340686-11b $4,800,000 $6,400,000 Newark City (JMEUC) S340686-11g $1,042,500 $1,390,000 East Orange City (JMEUC) S340686-11a $508,500 $678,000 Union Township (JMEUC) S340686-11k $1,837,500 $2,450,000 Irvington Township (JMEUC) S340686-11d $1,687,500 $2,250,000 West Orange Township (JMEUC) S340686-11l $1,200,000 $1,600,000 Maplewood Township (JMEUC) S340686-11e $712,500 $950,000 Hillside Township (JMEUC) S340686-11c $711,000 $948,000 Summit City (JMEUC) S340686-11j $900,000 $1,200,000 Millburn Township (JMEUC) S340686-11f $650,250 $867,000 South Orange Village Township (JMEUC) S340686-11i $531,000 $708,000 Roselle Park Borough (JMEUC) S340686-11h $390,000 $520,000 Berkeley Township S344020-03 $1,612,500 $2,150,000 Bergen County Utilities Authority S340386-26 $4,500,000 $6,000,000 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-37 $31,800,000 $42,400,000 East Orange City (JMEUC) S340686-12a $1,800,000 $2,400,000 Elizabeth City (JMEUC) S340686-12b $20,625,000 $27,500,000 Hillside Township (JMEUC) S340686-12c $2,700,000 $3,600,000 Irvington Township (JMEUC) S340686-12d $7,050,000 $9,400,000 Maplewood Township (JMEUC) S340686-12e $2,767,500 $3,690,000 Millburn Township (JMEUC) S340686-12f $2,460,000 $3,280,000 Newark City (JMEUC) S340686-12g $4,125,000 $5,500,000 Roselle Park Borough (JMEUC) S340686-12h $1,267,500 $1,690,000 South Orange Village Township (JMEUC) S340686-12i $1,875,000 $2,500,000 Summit City (JMEUC) S340686-12j $3,600,000 $4,800,000 Union Township (JMEUC) S340686-12k $7,650,000 $10,200,000 West Orange Township (JMEUC) S340686-12l $4,875,000 $6,500,000 Bergen County Utilities Authority S340386-13 $63,750,000 $85,000,000 East Orange City (JMEUC) S340686-08a $1,443,750 $1,925,000 Elizabeth City (JMEUC) S340686-08b $16,188,750 $21,585,000 Hillside Township (JMEUC) S340686-08c $2,141,250 $2,855,000 Irvington Township (JMEUC) S340686-08d $5,538,750 $7,385,000 Maplewood Township (JMEUC) S340686-08e $2,178,750 $2,905,000 Millburn Township (JMEUC) S340686-08f $1,942,500 $2,590,000 Newark City (JMEUC) S340686-08g $3,262,500 $4,350,000 Roselle Park Borough (JMEUC) S340686-08h $1,020,000 $1,360,000 South Orange Village Township (JMEUC) S340686-08i $1,515,000 $2,020,000 Summit (JMEUC) City S340686-08j $2,842,500 $3,790,000 Union Township (JMEUC) S340686-08k $6,022,500 $8,030,000 West Orange Township (JMEUC) S340686-08l $3,847,500 $5,130,000 Lambertville Municipal Utilities Authority S340882-11 $1,575,000 $2,100,000 Lakehurst Borough S340150-01 $1,200,000 $1,600,000 Landis Sewerage Authority S340461-07 $2,250,000 $3,000,000 Rockaway Valley Regional Sewer Authority S340821-11 $10,125,000 $13,500,000 Cumberland County Utilities Authority S340550-09 $10,500,000 $14,000,000 Seaside Heights Borough S340236-02 $4,125,000 $5,500,000 South Monmouth Regional Sewer Authority S340377-08 $1,725,000 $2,300,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-57 $32,175,000 $42,900,000 East Orange City (JMEUC) S340686-13a $339,750 $453,000 Elizabeth City (JMEUC) S340686-13b $3,210,000 $4,280,000 Hillside Township (JMEUC) S340686-13c $480,000 $640,000 Irvington Township (JMEUC) S340686-13d $1,147,500 $1,530,000 Maplewood Township (JMEUC) S340686-13e $487,500 $650,000 Millburn Township (JMEUC) S340686-13f $435,000 $580,000 Newark City (JMEUC) S340686-13g $712,500 $950,000 Roselle Park Borough (JMEUC) S340686-13h $255,000 $340,000 South Orange Village Township (JMEUC) S340686-13i $355,500 $474,000 Summit City (JMEUC) S340686-13j $618,750 $825,000 Union Township (JMEUC) S340686-13k $1,237,500 $1,650,000 West Orange Township (JMEUC) S340686-13l $810,000 $1,080,000 Hamilton Township S340898-06 $3,037,500 $4,050,000 South Monmouth Regional Sewer Authority S340377-07 $2,827,500 $3,770,000 Long Branch Sewerage Authority S340336-11 $1,837,500 $2,450,000 Maple Shade Township S340710-06 $1,612,500 $2,150,000 Metuchen Borough S340360-02 $6,750,000 $9,000,000 Newton Town S340449-08 $2,737,500 $3,650,000 Stafford Township S340946-11 $10,050,000 $13,400,000 Stafford Township S340946-12 $6,000,000 $8,000,000 Vernon Township S340745-03 $2,271,750 $3,029,000 Little Egg Harbor Municipal Utilities Authority S340579-05 $3,150,000 $4,200,000 Hightstown Borough S340915-08 $1,875,000 $2,500,000 Tuckerton Borough S340034-06 $900,000 $1,200,000 Pleasantville City S340752-04 $3,246,413 $4,328,550 Middlesex County Utilities Authority S340699-20 $11,250,000 $15,000,000 Woodbridge Township S340433-13 $6,375,000 $8,500,000 Middlesex County Utilities Authority S340699-16 $20,250,000 $27,000,000 Monmouth County Bayshore Outfall Authority S340325-04 $2,062,500 $2,750,000 Monmouth County Bayshore Outfall Authority S340325-04a $2,062,500 $2,750,000 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-30 $5,625,000 $7,500,000 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-34 $13,350,000 $17,800,000 Rockaway Valley Regional Sewer Authority S340821-10 $6,375,000 $8,500,000 Toms River Municipal Utilities Authority S340145-10 $4,732,500 $6,310,000 Toms River Municipal Utilities Authority S340145-07 $6,750,000 $9,000,000 Two Rivers Water Reclamation Authority S340117-10 $2,475,000 $3,300,000 Two Rivers Water Reclamation Authority S340117-10a $112,500,000 $150,000,000 Brick Township Municipal Utilities Authority S340448-12 $6,750,000 $9,000,000 Brick Township Municipal Utilities Authority S340448-15 $1,650,000 $2,200,000 Franklin Township Sewerage Authority S340839-11 $1,875,000 $2,500,000 Western Monmouth Utilities Authority S340128-08 $6,000,000 $8,000,000 Franklin Township Sewerage Authority S340839-10 $7,125,000 $9,500,000 Landis Sewerage Authority S340461-10 $2,700,000 $3,600,000 Landis Sewerage Authority S340461-06 $2,250,000 $3,000,000 Mount Laurel Township Municipal Utilities Authority S340943-09 $4,500,000 $6,000,000 Hackensack City S340923-22 $1,987,500 $2,650,000 North Brunswick Township S340888-04 $2,625,000 $3,500,000 Hillside Township S340686-10 $2,475,000 $3,300,000 Berkeley Heights Township S340385-08 $525,000 $700,000 Edgewater Park Sewerage Authority S340108-03 $2,250,000 $3,000,000 Haddon Heights Borough S340877-02 $487,500 $650,000 Highlands Borough S340901-05 $6,375,000 $8,500,000 Buena Borough S340519-01 $2,700,000 $3,600,000 Wildwood Crest Borough S340719-05 $3,075,000 $4,100,000 Cape May City S340258-03 $4,687,500 $6,250,000 Gibbsboro Borough S340871-04 $1,125,000 $1,500,000 Long Beach Township S340023-10 $5,677,500 $7,570,000 Fieldsboro Borough S340522-01 $3,750,000 $5,000,000 North Bergen Township S340652-17 $3,225,000 $4,300,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-46 $51,750,000 $69,000,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-54 $16,950,000 $22,600,000 Ocean Gate Borough S340151-02 $1,125,000 $1,500,000 Atlantic City S340439-07 $1,575,000 $2,100,000 Camden County Municipal Utilities Authority S340640-35 $3,862,500 $5,150,000 Ocean County Utilities Authority S340372-65 $3,150,000 $4,200,000 Northwest Bergen County Utilities Authority S340700-22 $2,025,000 $2,700,000 Seaside Heights Borough S340236-03 $2,550,000 $3,400,000 Seaside Park Borough S340083-05 $1,275,000 $1,700,000 North Bergen Municipal Utilities Authority S340652-19 $975,000 $1,300,000 Boonton Town S340265-02 $2,475,000 $3,300,000 Runnemede Borough S340363-07 $8,250,000 $11,000,000 Cumberland County S340438-03 $1,125,000 $1,500,000 Cumberland County S340438-03a $15,000,000 $20,000,000 Little Egg Harbor Township S340579-06 $3,000,000 $4,000,000 Gloucester Township S340364-19 $1,500,000 $2,000,000 Gloucester Township S340364-16 $450,000 $600,000 Gloucester Township S340364-17 $967,649 $1,290,198 Gloucester Township S340364-18 $1,125,000 $1,500,000 Passaic Valley Sewerage Commission S340689-66 $17,625,000 $23,500,000 Hackensack City S340923-25 $1,575,000 $2,100,000 Trenton City S340416-14 $18,000,000 $24,000,000 New Brunswick City S340437-13 $2,362,500 $3,150,000 Atlantic City Municipal Utilities Authority S340439-04 $2,300,000 $3,066,667 East Orange City S340843-03 $12,825,000 $17,100,000 Sussex County Municipal Utilities Authority S342008-07 $5,625,000 $7,500,000 Lakewood Township Municipal Utilities Authority S340465-04 $6,000,000 $8,000,000 Passaic Valley Water Commission S340322-03 $2,850,000 $3,800,000 Manchester Township S340650-09 $3,262,500 $4,350,000 Manchester Township S340650-10 $4,500,000 $6,000,000 Lyndhurst Township S340426-09 $3,000,000 $4,000,000 Pine Hill Municipal Utilities Authority S340274-06 $1,500,000 $2,000,000 Boonton Town S340265-03 $712,500 $950,000 Glen Ridge Borough S340861-02 $1,575,000 $2,100,000 Bordentown City S340219-04 $3,000,000 $4,000,000 Island Heights Borough S340176-03 $750,000 $1,000,000 Total Projects: 194 $1,951,118,701 $2,601,491,599 b.  The following environmental infrastructure projects shall be known and may be cited as the State Fiscal Year 2027 Drinking Water Project Eligibility List: Project Sponsor Project Number Estimated Allowable Trust Loan Amount Estimated Total Loan Amount Passaic Valley Water Commission 1605002-002 $41,287,500 $55,050,000 Lakewood Township Municipal Utilities Authority 1514002-001 $11,250,000 $15,000,000 Orange City 0717001-013 $975,000 $1,300,000 New Brunswick City 1214001-001 $9,637,500 $12,850,000 New Brunswick City 1214001-005 $79,500,000 $106,000,000 Camden City 0408001-001 $55,725,000 $74,300,000 Wildwood City 0514001-007 $18,750,000 $25,000,000 Red Bank Borough 1340001-004 $9,000,000 $12,000,000 Flemington Borough 1009001-010 $300,000 $400,000 Manchester Utilities Authority 1603001-001 $787,500 $1,050,000 Bloomfield Township 0702001-004 $3,000,000 $4,000,000 Jersey City Municipal Utilities Authority 0906001-035 $38,587,500 $51,450,000 Merchantville Pennsauken Water Commission 0424001-006 $7,612,500 $10,150,000 Aqua New Jersey Incorporated 0415002-001 $6,637,500 $8,850,000 East Newark Borough 0902001-001 $1,537,500 $2,050,000 Ridgewood Village 0251001-001 $46,012,500 $61,350,000 Ridgewood Village 0251001-002 $13,500,000 $18,000,000 Ridgewood Village 0251001-003 $7,200,000 $9,600,000 Ridgewood Village 0251001-004 $9,637,500 $12,850,000 Ridgewood Village 0251001-005 $4,725,000 $6,300,000 Ridgewood Village 0251001-006 $4,725,000 $6,300,000 Belleville Township 0701001-008 $2,676,564 $3,568,752 Livingston Township 0710001-001 $9,000,000 $12,000,000 Livingston Township 0710001-002 $3,750,000 $5,000,000 Ramsey Borough 0248001-016 $2,962,500 $3,950,000 Essex Fells Borough 0706001-004 $3,750,000 $5,000,000 Essex Fells Borough 0706001-005 $3,787,500 $5,050,000 Lake Stockholm Systems, Inc. 1911002-001 $1,725,000 $2,300,000 Aqua New Jersey Incorporated 1911004-001 $2,250,000 $3,000,000 Newton Town 1915001-001 $3,000,000 $4,000,000 Atlantic City Municipal Utilities Authority 0102001-013 $3,900,000 $5,200,000 Washington Township Municipal Utilities Authority 1438004-005 $6,825,000 $9,100,000 Wildwood City 0514001-008 $2,662,500 $3,550,000 NJ American Water Company, Inc. 2121001-001 $9,450,000 $12,600,000 Newark City 0714001-023 $17,250,000 $23,000,000 Seaside Heights Borough 1526001-002 $7,500,000 $10,000,000 Allentown Borough 1302001-006 $945,000 $1,260,000 Allentown Borough 1302001-007 $2,437,500 $3,250,000 Bloomfield Township 0702001-006 $7,387,500 $9,850,000 NJ American Water Company, Inc. 2004002-015 $15,000,000 $20,000,000 Trenton City 1111001-013 $7,893,900 $10,525,200 Ridgewood Village 0251001-007 $13,462,500 $17,950,000 Aqua New Jersey Incorporated 2119001-002 $7,162,500 $9,550,000 Hawthorne Borough 1604001-003 $2,100,000 $2,800,000 Hawthorne Borough 1604001-004 $2,250,000 $3,000,000 Hawthorne Borough 1604001-006 $2,587,500 $3,450,000 Maple Shade Township 0319001-001 $3,600,000 $4,800,000 Margate City 0116001-003 $4,950,000 $6,600,000 Chatham Borough 1404001-001 $7,666,500 $10,222,000 Bayonne City 0901001-005 $9,375,000 $12,500,000 Hightstown Borough 1104001-013 $1,125,000 $1,500,000 Longport Borough 0115001-001 $4,650,000 $6,200,000 Passaic Valley Water Commission 1605002-033 $3,750,000 $5,000,000 Park Ridge Borough 0247001-002 $3,187,500 $4,250,000 Jersey City Municipal Utilities Authority 0906001-024 $13,762,500 $18,350,000 Manchester Utilities Authority 1603001-004 $1,500,000 $2,000,000 Mount Laurel Township Municipal Utilities Authority 0324001-004 $1,500,000 $2,000,000 Verona Township 0720001-006 $3,750,000 $5,000,000 Verona Township 0720001-007 $3,450,000 $4,600,000 Boonton Town 1401001-003 $4,875,000 $6,500,000 Old Bridge Municipal Utilities Authority 1209002-005 $3,525,000 $4,700,000 Cape May City 0502001-005 $1,875,000 $2,500,000 Stone Harbor Borough 0510001-001 $6,262,500 $8,350,000 Newton Town 1915001-003 $750,000 $1,000,000 Seaside Heights Borough 1526001-003 $4,050,000 $5,400,000 Hightstown Borough 1104001-011 $825,000 $1,100,000 Hoboken City 0905001-004 $3,112,500 $4,150,000 Burlington City 0305001-003 $1,650,000 $2,200,000 Berkeley Township Municipal Utilities Authority 1505323-001 $1,575,000 $2,100,000 North Brunswick Township 1215001-008 $4,875,000 $6,500,000 Edison Township 1205001-001 $6,375,000 $8,500,000 Ship Bottom Borough 1528001-005 $1,687,500 $2,250,000 Little Egg Harbor Municipal Utilities Authority 1516001-007 $2,625,000 $3,500,000 Clinton Town 1005001-021 $2,887,500 $3,850,000 Clinton Town 1005001-022 $1,687,500 $2,250,000 Glen Ridge Borough 0708001-010 $2,625,000 $3,500,000 North Caldwell Borough 0715001-002 $2,850,000 $3,800,000 Roosevelt Borough 1314001-003 $1,500,000 $2,000,000 Roosevelt Borough 1341001-008 $750,000 $1,000,000 Roosevelt Borough 1341001-009 $600,000 $800,000 Robbinsville Township 1112001-001 $2,062,500 $2,750,000 Evesham Municipal Utilities Authority 0313001-004 $3,225,000 $4,300,000 Willingboro Municipal Utilities Authority 0338001-014 $2,625,000 $3,500,000 Marlboro Township 1328002-010 $1,387,500 $1,850,000 Monroe Municipal Utilities Authority 0811002-003 $4,875,000 $6,500,000 Ventnor City 0122001-003 $3,375,000 $4,500,000 Hawthorne Borough 1604001-005 $1,200,000 $1,600,000 Pine Hill Municipal Utilities Authority 0428002-006 $2,325,000 $3,100,000 Point Pleasant Beach Borough 1525001-003 $1,875,000 $2,500,000 Allamuchy Township 2101001-001 $1,125,000 $1,500,000 Ocean Gate Borough 1521001-004 $750,000 $1,000,000 Brookwood Musconetcong River Property Owners Association 1904001-005 $1,575,000 $2,100,000 Mount Arlington Borough 1426005-001 $1,575,000 $2,100,000 Brick Township Municipal Utilities Authority 1506001-016 $8,475,000 $11,300,000 Verona Township 0720001-008 $1,500,000 $2,000,000 Pemberton Township 0329004-001 $3,187,500 $4,250,000 Lavallette Borough 1515001-002 $4,987,500 $6,650,000 Harvey Cedars Borough 1509001-002 $2,325,000 $3,100,000 Total Projects: 98 $679,781,964 $906,375,952 c.  The trust is authorized to adjust the allowable trust loan amount for projects authorized in this section to between zero percent and 100 percent of the total allowable loan amount, and, if the trust loan amount is adjusted to 100 percent of the total allowable loan amount, the loan shall be provided pursuant to the terms and conditions of the financing program year in which the construction loan component of the project was certified by the department, and for which the trust issued an interim financing program loan for the project, or, in the absence of an interim financing program loan, the terms and conditions of the State fiscal year 2027 financing program. 5.  In accordance with and subject to the provisions of sections 5, 6, and 23 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5, C.58:11B-6, and C.58:11B-23), and as set forth in the financial plan required pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-21), or the financial plan required pursuant to section 25 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-21.1), any proceeds from bonds issued by the trust to make loans for priority environmental infrastructure projects listed in sections 2 and 4 of this act which are not expended for that purpose may be applied for the payment of all or any part of the principal of, or interest and premium on, the trust bonds whether due at stated maturity, the interest payment dates, or earlier upon redemption.  A portion of the proceeds from bonds issued by the trust to make loans for priority environmental infrastructure projects pursuant to this act may be applied for the payment of capitalized interest and for the payment of any issuance expenses; for the payment of reserve capacity expenses; for the payment of debt service reserve fund expenses for the payment of the loan origination fees; and for the payment of increased costs, as defined and determined in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the trust pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-27). 6.  Any loan made by the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank pursuant to this act shall be subject to the following requirements: a.  The chairperson, vice chairperson, or secretary of the trust has certified that the project is in compliance with the provisions of P.L.1977, c.224, P.L.1985, c.334, P.L.1992, c.88, P.L.1997, c.223, P.L.1997, c.224, P.L.1997, c.225, P.L.1999, c.175, or P.L.2003, c.162, and any amendatory and supplementary acts thereto, and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, as applicable.  In making this certification, the chairperson, vice chairperson, or secretary may conclusively rely on the project review conducted by the Department of Environmental Protection without any independent review thereof by the trust; b.  The loan shall be conditioned upon inclusion of the project on a project eligibility list approved pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-20) or section 24 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-20.1); c.  The loan shall be repaid within a period not to exceed 30 years, 35 years for loans funded pursuant to the federal Water Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 2014, 33 U.S.C. s.3901 et seq., as amended and supplemented, or 45 years for combined sewer overflow abatement projects, of the making of the loan; d.  The loan, including any portion thereof made by the trust pursuant to subsection f. of section 7 of this act, shall not exceed the allowable project cost of the environmental infrastructure facility, exclusive of capitalized interest, interest accrued pursuant to a short-term or temporary loan made to a project sponsor pursuant to the Interim Environmental Financing Program, administrative expenses associated with federal funding programs, if applicable, and issuance expenses as provided in subsection b. of section 7 of this act, reserve capacity expenses and the debt service reserve fund expenses as provided in subsection c. of section 7 of this act, interest earned on project costs as provided in subsection d. of section 7 of this act, the amounts of the loan origination fee as provided in subsection e. of section 7 of this act, refunding increases as provided in section 8 of this act and increased costs as defined and determined in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the trust pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-27); e.  The loan shall bear interest, exclusive of any late charges or administrative fees payable to the trust pursuant to subsection o. of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5) by the project sponsors receiving trust loans, at or below the interest rate paid by the trust on the bonds issued to make or refund the loans authorized by this act, adjusted for underwriting discount and original issue discount or premium, in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the financial plan required pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-21) or the financial plan required pursuant to section 25 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-21.1); f.  The loan shall be subject to all other terms and conditions as the trust shall determine to be consistent with the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) and any rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and with the financial plan required by section 21 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-21) or the financial plan required pursuant to section 25 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-21.1); g.  Notwithstanding any provision of this act or a financial plan of the trust for State fiscal years 2018 through 2022 developed pursuant to section 21 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-21) or section 25 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-21.1) to the contrary, a loan for an environmental infrastructure project listed in section 2 or 3 of this act that is partially funded from the proceeds of bonds issued by the trust to the United States Environmental Protection Agency pursuant to the federal Water Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 2014, 33 U.S.C. s.3901 et seq., shall be subject to terms and conditions regulating the blending of federal and other funds that are consistent with those provisions of Section III of the applicable financial plan of the trust for State fiscal year 2027 that reference the federal Water Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 2014; and h.  The eligibility lists and authorization for the making of loans pursuant to this act shall expire on July 1, 2027, and any project sponsor which has not executed and delivered a loan agreement with the trust for a loan authorized in this act shall no longer be entitled to that loan. 7.  a.  The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank is authorized to reduce the individual amount of loan funds made available to or on behalf of project sponsors pursuant to sections 2 and 4 of this act based upon final building costs defined in and determined in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the trust pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-27) or rules and regulations adopted by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.329, section 11 of P.L.1977, c.224 (C.58:12A-11) or section 5 of P.L.1981, c.261.  The trust is authorized to use any such reduction in the loan amount made available to a project sponsor to cover that project sponsors increased costs due to differing site conditions or other allowable expenses as defined and determined in accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the trust pursuant to section 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-27). b.  The trust is authorized to increase each loan amount authorized in sections 2 and 4 of this act by the amount of capitalized interest, interest accrued pursuant to a short-term or temporary loan made to a project sponsor pursuant to the Interim Environmental Financing Program, issuance expenses, and administrative expenses associated with federal funding programs, if applicable, allocable to each loan made by the trust pursuant to this act. c.  The trust is authorized to increase each loan amount authorized in sections 2 and 4 of this act by the amount of reserve capacity expenses and by the debt service reserve fund expenses associated with the costs identified in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection d. of section 1 of this act. d.  The trust is authorized to increase each loan amount authorized in sections 2 and 4 of this act by the interest earned on amounts deposited for project costs pending their distribution to project sponsors. e.  The trust is authorized to increase each loan amount authorized in sections 2 and 4 of this act by the loan origination fee. f.  The trust is authorized to increase each loan amount authorized in sections 2 and 4 of this act by the amount appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection for the purpose of making the corresponding zero-interest loan pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as Senate Bill No. 4221 of the 2026-2027 session and Assembly Bill No.      of the 2026-2027 session) in connection with the project costs of the project sponsor, to the extent the priority ranking or an insufficiency of funding prevents the department from meeting program demand, and for lead abatement projects ineligible for department loans under the Federal Clean Water Act and Safe Drinking Water Act. 8.  The New Jersey Infrastructure Bank is authorized to increase the individual amount of loan funds made available to project sponsors by the trust pursuant to P.L.1989, c.190, P.L.1990, c.97, P.L.1991, c.324, P.L.1992, c.37, P.L.1993, c.192, P.L.1994, c.105, P.L.1995, c.218, P.L.1996, c.87, P.L.1997, c.222, P.L.1998, c.85, P.L.1999, c.173, P.L.2000, c.93, P.L.2001, c.224, P.L.2002, c.71, P.L.2003, c.159, P.L.2004, c.110, P.L.2005, c.197, P.L.2006, c.67, P.L.2007, c.140, P.L.2008, c.67, P.L.2009, c.101, P.L.2010, c.62, P.L.2011, c.95, P.L.2012, c.38, P.L.2013, c.94, P.L.2014, c.26, P.L.2015, c.107, P.L.2016, c.31, as amended by P.L.2017, c.13, P.L.2017, c.142, as amended by P.L.2017, c.327, P.L.2018, c.84, as amended by P.L.2019, c.30, P.L.2019, c.192, as amended by P.L.2019, c.515, P.L.2020, c.48, as amended by P.L.2021, c.22, P.L.2021, c.204, as amended by P.L.2021, c.316, P.L.2022, c.100, as amended by P.L.2023, c.5, P.L.2023, c.119, as amended by P.L.2023, c.343, P.L.2024, c.41, as amended by P.L.2025, c.8, P.L.2025, c.125, as amended by P.L.2025, c.183, or this act, provided that adequate savings are achieved, to compensate for a refunding of trust bonds issued to make loans authorized by the aforementioned acts. 9.  The expenditure of funds authorized pursuant to this act is subject to the provisions of P.L.1977, c.224 (C.58:12A-1 et al.), P.L.1985, c.329, P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) as amended and supplemented by P.L.1997, c.224, P.L.1992, c.88, P.L.1989, c.181, P.L.1997, c.223, P.L.1997, c.225, P.L.1999, c.175, or P.L.2003, c.162, the rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto, and the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, as appropriate. 10.  a.  There is appropriated to the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank, as needed to make short-term or temporary loans, from funds deposited in any account, including the Wastewater Treatment Fund, the 1992 Wastewater Treatment Fund, the Water Supply Fund, the 2003 Water Resources and Wastewater Treatment Trust Fund, the Stormwater Management and Combined Sewer Overflow Abatement Fund, the Clean Water State Revolving Fund, the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund, or the funds transferred to the trust by the department pursuant to paragraph (21) of subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as Senate Bill No. 4221 of the 2026-2027 session and Assembly Bill No.      of the 2026-2027 session), as appropriate, and from any net earnings received from the investment and reinvestment of such deposits, an amount of up to $2 billion, to the extent funds are available, consisting of: (1) The uncommitted balance currently on deposit as of July 1, 2026 in the special fund (hereinafter referred to as the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund) created and established by the trust for the short-term or temporary loan financing or refinancing program (hereinafter referred to as the Interim Environmental Financing Program) authorized pursuant to subsection d. of section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9), which balance previously had been appropriated to the trust for such purpose pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2019, c.192, less any Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund amounts appropriated to the Department of Environmental Protection to supplement the sums appropriated from the Clean Water State Revolving Fund for clean water projects pursuant to the Federal Clean Water Act and from the Drinking Water State Revolving Fund for drinking water projects pursuant to the Federal Safe Drinking Water Act, provided that at no time shall funds committed pursuant to this section exceed funds required by the Department of Environmental Protection to meet long-term obligations; and (2) such other amounts to be deposited in the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund, in an aggregate amount that does not exceed at any time, the amount appropriated, provided that the amount so reappropriated and appropriated to the trust for deposit in the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund shall be utilized by the trust to make short-term or temporary loans pursuant to the Interim Environmental Financing Program to any one or more of the project sponsors, for the respective projects thereof, identified in the interim environmental financing project priority list (hereinafter referred to as the Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List) in the form provided to the Legislature by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. b.      The Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List shall be submitted to the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the General Assembly at least once each fiscal year.  The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the General Assembly shall cause the date of submission to be entered upon the Senate Journal and the Minutes of the General Assembly, respectively.  Any environmental infrastructure project or the project sponsor thereof not identified in the Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List shall not be eligible for a short-term or temporary loan from the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund. c.  The trust may issue market rate interest short-term temporary loans for wastewater treatment and water supply projects on the Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List for the reduction of lead in publicly-owned facilities otherwise ineligible to receive funding for that purpose pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 11.  a.  There is appropriated to the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank for deposit in an environmental subaccount of the special fund created and established by the trust for the short-term or temporary Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program loan financing or refinancing program (hereinafter referred to as the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program) authorized pursuant to subsection a. of section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5) such sums as needed consisting of: (1) sums from the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund as needed by the trust to make short-term or temporary loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program to any one or more of the project sponsors, for the respective projects thereof; and (2) such other amounts to be deposited in the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Fund, provided that the amount so appropriated to the trust for deposit in the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Fund shall be utilized by the trust to make short-term or temporary loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program to any one or more of the project sponsors, for the respective projects thereof.  Any environmental projects funded by the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program shall be subject to the approval of the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. b.  The Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) at least once in each fiscal year.  Any environmental infrastructure project or the project sponsor thereof not identified in the Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List shall not be eligible for a short-term or temporary loan from the Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Fund. 12.  There is appropriated to the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank, such funds as are available from the Economic Development and Infrastructure Improvement Revolving Fund created pursuant to the annual appropriations act for State fiscal year 2021, P.L.2020, c.97, to provide a debt service reserve or guarantee to a local government unit that meets the departments affordability criteria, in order to satisfy creditworthiness requirements of the New Jersey Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program to finance an environmental infrastructure component of a redevelopment project. 13.  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection b. of section 23 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-23) or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the funds generated by the operation of the trust, including, but not limited to: proceeds from the sale of the trusts bonds, notes, or other obligations; revenues derived from investments by the trust; loan repayments, including interest from local government units; any funds received from the federal government permitted to be used for operating expenses; fees and charges levied by the trust; or any other sources of funds permitted to be used for operating expenses may be utilized by the trust for its annual operating expenses. 14.  Notwithstanding the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, the trust shall not be required to adopt rules and regulations governing the making of Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program loans. 15.  This act shall take effect immediately.